Utah statutes.
11-32-8.   Dissolution of financing authority.
(1)  The governing body of a county may at any time dissolve a financing
authority created by the county in the manner then provided in Title 16,
Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, subject to the limitations
of this chapter.
(2)  A financing authority may not be dissolved unless all outstanding bonds
and other obligations of the authority are paid in full as to principal,
interest, and redemption premiums, if any, or unless provision for the payment
of them when due has been made.
(3)  Upon the dissolution of a financing authority all assets and money of the
authority remaining after a provision has been made for the payment of all
outstanding bonds and obligations of the authority shall be transferred to the
participant members as described in Section 11-32-15 or as agreed upon between
the county and the other participant members.
